Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-729
District; formation; objections.

All owners of real estate situated in the proposed district who have not signed the articles of association and who may object to the organization of the district or to any one or more of the proposed trustees shall, on or before the time in which they are required to answer, file any such objection in writing, stating (1) why such sanitary and improvement district should not be organized and declared a public corporation in this state, (2) why their land will not be benefited by the installation of a sewer or water system, or both a sewer and water system, a system of sidewalks, public roads, streets, and highways, public waterways, docks or wharfs, and related appurtenances, and gas and electricity for street lighting for the public streets and highways within the district, by the contracting for solid waste collection services, by the construction or contracting for the construction of dikes and levees for flood protection for the district, gas or electric service lines and conduits, and water for fire protection and the health and property of the owners protected, by the acquisition, improvement and operation of public parks, playgrounds, and recreational facilities, by acquiring, purchasing, leasing, owning, erecting, constructing, equipping, operating, or maintaining all or a portion of offstreet motor vehicle public parking facilities located in the district to serve business, and, where permitted by section 31-727, by the contracting with other sanitary and improvement districts for the building, acquisition, improvement, and operation of public parks, playgrounds, and recreational facilities for the joint use of the residents of the contracting districts, (3) why their land should not be embraced in the limits of such district, and (4) their objections if any to any one or more of the proposed trustees.

Laws 1949, c. 78, § 3, p. 196;

Laws 1955, c. 117, § 3, p. 312;

Laws 1961, c. 142, § 3, p. 412;

Laws 1967, c. 189, § 3, p. 521;

Laws 1969, c. 250, § 3, p. 912;

Laws 1973, LB 245, § 3;

Laws 1974, LB 757, § 9;

Laws 2015, LB324, § 3;

Laws 2021, LB81, § 3.

Landowner may object to inclusion of land within district. Zwink v. Ahlman, 177 Neb. 15, 128 N.W.2d 121 (1964).